Georgia, session 2025_26, HB206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended by
repealing Article 2 of Chapter 1, the "Drug-free Postsecondary Education Act of 1990," in
its entirety.
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended by repealing and reserving paragraph (5) in Code Sections
20-3-395.4, 20-3-400.6, and 20-3-405.7, relating to ineligibility relative to direct loans,
H. B. 206
- 1 -

LC 61 0012
ineligibility relative to graduate on time student loans, and ineligibility relative to education
for public service student loan, respectively.
SECTION 3.
Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 20-3-519.1, relating to eligibility for
HOPE scholarships or grants, by repealing and reserving paragraph (5) of subsection (b) and
by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(c) A student shall not be deemed ineligible for any scholarship or grant described in this
part solely based on a conviction for an offense involving marijuana or a controlled
substance."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 206
- 2 -